Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1036
Election results; reporting requirements; fee authorized.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall report to the Secretary of State all election results of statewide primary and general elections by precinct within eight weeks after the county canvass of such elections for President, Vice President, United States Senate, United States House of Representatives, members of the Legislature, members of the Public Service Commission, and the offices of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, and Attorney General. The Secretary of State shall retain the election results for at least five years and shall collate, arrange, computerize, or publish reports arranging the election results. The Secretary of State may charge a fee as provided in section 33-101 for copies of such election results.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 330.